Maine, session 132, LD782.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-G, sub-§1, ¶C, as repealed and replaced by PL 2005, c.
3, Pt. M, §1 and affected by §2, is amended to read:
C. A qualified elderly or disabled person when the person's family income is equal to
or below 100% 138% of the nonfarm income official poverty line;
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3174-G, sub-§1, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 597, §7, is
further amended to read:
E. On or before September 30, 2012, the parent or caretaker relative of a child
described in paragraph B when the child's family income is equal to or below 200% of
the nonfarm income official poverty line, subject to adjustment by the commissioner
under this paragraph and, beginning October 1, 2012, the parent or caretaker relative
of a child described in paragraph B when the child's family income is equal to or below
133% 138% of the nonfarm income official poverty line, subject to adjustment by the
commissioner under this paragraph. Medicaid services provided under this paragraph
must be provided within the limits of the program budget. Funds appropriated for
services under this paragraph must include an annual inflationary adjustment
equivalent to the rate of inflation in the Medicaid program. On a quarterly basis, the
commissioner shall determine the fiscal status of program expenditures under this
paragraph. If the commissioner determines that expenditures will exceed the funds
available to provide Medicaid coverage pursuant to this paragraph, the commissioner
must adjust the income eligibility limit for new applicants to the extent necessary to
operate the program within the program budget. If, after an adjustment has occurred
pursuant to this paragraph, expenditures fall below the program budget, the
commissioner must raise the income eligibility limit to the extent necessary to provide
services to as many eligible persons as possible within the fiscal constraints of the
program budget, as long as on or before September 30, 2012 the income limit does not
exceed 200% of the nonfarm income official poverty line and, beginning October 1,
2012, the income limit does not exceed 133% 138% of the nonfarm income official
poverty line;
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3174-G, sub-§1, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 597, §8, is
further amended to read:
E. On or before September 30, 2012, the parent or caretaker relative of a child
described in paragraph B when the child's family income is equal to or below 200% of
the nonfarm income official poverty line, subject to adjustment by the commissioner
under this paragraph and, beginning October 1, 2012, the parent or caretaker relative
of a child described in paragraph B when the child's family income is equal to or below
100% 138% of the nonfarm income official poverty line. Medicaid services provided
under this paragraph must be provided within the limits of the program budget. Funds
appropriated for services under this paragraph must include an annual inflationary
adjustment equivalent to the rate of inflation in the Medicaid program. On a quarterly
basis, the commissioner shall determine the fiscal status of program expenditures under
this paragraph. If the commissioner determines that expenditures will exceed the funds
available to provide Medicaid coverage pursuant to this paragraph, the commissioner
must adjust the income eligibility limit for new applicants to the extent necessary to
operate the program within the program budget. If, after an adjustment has occurred
Page 1 - 132LR0951(01)

416 pursuant to this paragraph, expenditures fall below the program budget, the
427 commissioner must raise the income eligibility limit to the extent necessary to provide
438 services to as many eligible persons as possible within the fiscal constraints of the
449 program budget, as long as on or before September 30, 2012 the income limit does not
550 exceed 200% of the nonfarm income official poverty line;
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §3174-G, sub-§1, ¶G, as amended by PL 2021, c. 519, §5, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) A child person under 21 23 years of age;
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §3174-AA, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 450, Pt. A, §4, is
amended to read:
2. Savings. An amount up to $8,000 $15,000 for an individual and up to $12,000
$25,000 for a household of more than one person.
Sec. 6. Rulemaking. The Department of Health and Human Services shall amend
its rules establishing the maximum asset limits for MaineCare eligibility for individuals
who are working with a disabling condition to $15,000 for an individual and $25,000 for a
household of more than one person. Amendments to rules adopted pursuant to this section
are routine technical rules pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.